pt-BR: Rampa, textura da superfície: Lixa; Ranhurada; Revestimento antiderrapante; Estriada; Lisa; Texturizada; Outros
zh-TW: 坡道表面紋理: 防滑砂紙; 溝槽設計; 防滑塗層; 條紋設計; 平滑; 紋理設計; 其他
ru: Текстура поверхности рампы: Шкурка (гриптейп); Рифленая; Нескользящее покрытие; Ребристая; Гладкая; Текстурированная; Другое
de: Oberflächentextur der Skateboardrampe: Griptape; Gerillt; Rutschfeste Beschichtung; Gerippt; Glatt; Strukturiert; Sonstige
it: Texture della superficie della rampa: Grip tape; Scanalata; Rivestimento antiscivolo; A coste; Liscia; Ruvida; Altro
da: Overfladetekstur på rampe: Griptape; Rillet; Skridsikker belægning; Ribbet; Glat; Tekstureret; Andet
nl: Hellingsvlakstructuur: Griptape; Gegroefd; Antisliplaag; Geribbeld; Glad; Getextureerd; Overig
sl-SI: Tekstura površine klančine: Trak za oprijem; Užlebljena; Protizdrsni premaz; Rebrasta; Gladka; Teksturirana; Drugo
hr-HR: Tekstura površine rampe: Grip traka; Užlijebljeno; Protuklizni premaz; Rebrasto; Glatko; S teksturom; Ostalo
nb: Overflatetekstur på rampe: Griptape; Rillet; Sklisikkert belegg; Ribbet; Glatt; Strukturert; Annet
fi: Rampin pinnan tekstuuri: Grip-teippi; Uritettu; Liukumaton pinnoite; Harjanteinen; Sileä; Kuvioitu; Muu
ja: ランプ表面テクスチャ: グリップテープ; 溝付き; 滑り止めコーティング; リブ付き; スムース; テクスチャード; その他
th: ลวดลายพื้นผิวทางลาด: เทปกันลื่น; เซาะร่อง; สารเคลือบกันลื่น; มีสันนูน; เรียบ; มีพื้นผิว; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 坡道表面纹理: 防滑贴; 开槽; 防滑涂层; 罗纹; 光滑; 带纹理; 其他
bg-BG: Текстура на повърхността на рампата: Лента тип шкурка; Набраздена; Противоплъзгащо покритие; Оребрена; Гладка; Текстурирана; Други
fr: Texture de la surface de la rampe: Griptape; Rainuré; Revêtement antidérapant; Cannelé; Lisse; Texturé; Autre
cs: Povrchová textura rampy: Protiskluzová páska; Drážkovaný; Protiskluzový nátěr; Žebrovaný; Hladký; Strukturovaný; Ostatní
es: Textura de la superficie de la rampa: Cinta de agarre; Acanalada; Revestimiento antideslizante; Estriada; Lisa; Texturizada; Otro
lt-LT: Rampos paviršiaus tekstūra: Sukibimo juosta; Su grioveliais; Neslystanti danga; Rantuota; Lygi; Tekstūruota; Kita
sk-SK: Textúra povrchu rampy: Grip páska; Drážkovaná; Protišmyková vrstva; Rebrovaná; Hladká; Textúrovaná; Iné
ko: 램프 표면 질감: 그립 테이프; 홈파임; 미끄럼 방지 코팅; 리브형; 매끄러움; 텍스처 처리; 기타
pt-PT: Textura da superfície da rampa: Fita antiderrapante; Com ranhuras; Revestimento antiderrapante; Estriado; Liso; Texturado; Outro
sv: Ytstruktur för ramp: Grepptejp; Räfflad; Halkskyddsbeläggning; Ribbad; Slät; Strukturerad; Övrigt
ro-RO: Textură a suprafeței rampei: Bandă antiderapantă; Canelată; Înveliș antiderapant; Striată; Netedă; Texturată; Altele
hu: Rámpa felületi textúrája: Csúszásgátló szalag; Hornyolt; Csúszásgátló bevonat; Bordázott; Sima; Texturált; Egyéb
pl: Faktura powierzchni rampy: Taśma antypoślizgowa; Rowkowana; Powłoka antypoślizgowa; Prążkowana; Gładka; Teksturowana; Inne
vi: Kết cấu bề mặt của đường dốc: Băng dính chống trượt; Có rãnh; Lớp phủ chống trượt; Có gân; Nhẵn; Có vân; Khác
el: Υφή επιφάνειας της ράμπας: Ταινία αντιολισθητική; Με αυλακώσεις; Αντιολισθητική επίστρωση; Με ραβδώσεις; Λεία; Ανάγλυφη; Άλλο
en: Ramp surface texture: Grip tape; Grooved; Non-slip coating; Ribbed; Smooth; Textured; Other
tr: Rampa yüzey dokusu: Kaydırmaz bant; Oluklu; Kaymaz kaplama; Tırtıklı; Pürüzsüz; Dokulu; Diğer